lexicon/hebrew.foma
!
! hebrew.foma - Main FST Definitions
! Composes all LEXC lexicons into a single morphological analyzer
!
! Usage:
!   foma
!   foma> read lexc hebrew.foma
!   foma> define MyFst
!   foma> apply up word
!   foma> apply down analysis
!

! ============================================================
! Define the analyzer
! ============================================================

define Inanimate NOUNS [ [[+I]:+II [":"]:":"] | [+I] [+II] [+III] ] ] ;
define Animate [ א | ב | ג | ד | ה | ו | ז | ח | ט | י | כ | ל | מ | נ | ס | ע | פ | צ | ק | ר | ש | ת ] ;

define Rootletter [א|ב|ג|ד|ה|ו|ז|ח|ט|י|כ|ל|מ|נ|ס|ע|פ|צ|ק|ר|ש|ת] ;
define Consonant [ Rootletter | ׂ | �ּ ] ;
define Vowel [ א | א | ה | ו | י | ה ]:0 ;

define Letter [ Consonant | Vowel ] ;

define NounPhonology [ ׂ -> 0 || ק _ ]:1 ;
define DageshRule [ ׂ -> ׂ || Consonant _ Consonant ]:2 ;
define HeFinal [ ה -> 0 || _ # ]:3 ;

regex
  [INFLVERB+SUF]
  .o.
  [PHONOLOGY]
;

! ============================================================
! Alternative: simpler phrase-based composition
! ============================================================

define MORPHOLOGY
  [PREFIX]
  .o.
  [STEM]
  .o.
  [SUFFIX]
;

define PREFIX
  [PROCLITIC]*
;

define STEM
  ROOTS
  .o.
  STEMS
;

define SUFFIX
  [PERFSUF]
  | [IM PFSUF]
  | [POSSESSIVE]
;

define PROCLITIC
  %<art%>:h
  | %<conj%>:w
  | %<b%>:b
  | %<k%>:k
  | %<l%>:l
;

define PHONOLOGY
  NounPhonology
  .o.
  DageshRule
  .o.
  HeFinal
;

define INFLVERB
  VFINAL
  .o.
  VINF
  .o.
  VBSE
;

define PERFSUF
  %<3ms%>:0
  | %<3fs%>:0
  | %<2ms%>:Ta
  | %<2fs%>:Ta
  | %<1cs%>:Ti
  | %<3mp%>:hem
  | %<2mp%>:kem
  | %<1cp%>:nu
;

define IMPFSUF
  %<3ms%>:y
  | %<2ms%>:t
  | %<1cs%>:3
  | %<1cp%>:n
;

define POSSESSIVE
  %<1cs%>:i
  | %<2ms%>:Xa
  | %<3ms%>:o
  | %<3fs%>:h
;

define VFINAL
  [qal]
  | [niphal]
  | [piel]
  | [pual]
  | [hiphil]
  | [hophal]
  | [hithpael]
;

define VINF
  [qal-inf]
  | [niphal-inf]
  | [piel-inf]
  | [hiphil-inf]
  | [qal-pas]
;

define VBSE
  [qal-ar]
  | [niphal-ar]
  | [piel-ar]
  | [hiphil-ar]
  | [hithpael-ar]
;

!
